Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 1

Applicability of Chapter

12-3-101. State requirements to be purchased by the central procurement office.

Except as provided in §§12-3-102 and12-3-103, all goods and services, and all telephone, telegraph, electric light, gas, power, postal services, and the leasing of any equipment required for the use of state government, shall be purchased and contracted for by the central procurement office consistent with the requirements of this chapter and any rules, regulations or policies and procedures approved by the procurement commission.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 12, ch. 3 and ch. 4, part 1 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 8-70, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 1, §§12-3-101 —12-3-133 (Williams, §§ 370.11, 370.27, 370.31, 370.32, 370.37, 370.39, 370.40); impl. am. Acts 1957, ch. 4, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; Acts 1969, ch. 115, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1969, ch. 302, § 1; Acts 1971, ch. 405, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 144, § 4; 1973, ch. 216, § 1; 1973, ch. 320, § 4; 1975, ch. 60, § 1; 1976, ch. 601, § 1; 1976, ch. 776, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 437, § 1; 1978, ch. 932, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 12-309, 12-328, 12-329, 12-333, 12-334, 12-336; 12-337,12-3-123,12-3-124,12-3-128,12-3-131,12-3-132; Acts 1980, ch. 741, § 4; T.C.A., §12-3-130; Acts 1981, ch. 332, §§ 16, 17; 1986, ch. 896, § 1; 1987, ch. 337, § 17; 1995, ch. 305, § 97; 1996, ch. 682, § 1; 2003, ch. 288, § 1; 2009, ch. 106, § 5; 2010, ch. 694, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19; 2012, ch. 731, § 1) was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 8-12, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-101(b) were transferred to §12-3-202.

Former §§12-3-108 —12-3-132 were transferred in 1981.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Business enterprise programs for the blind, exemption from state purchasing requirements, §71-4-403.

Driver license photo system competitive bidding provisions applicable, §55-50-335.

Public purchasing chapter inapplicable to certain prison contractors, §41-24-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Alternative dispute resolution commission exempt, OAG 96-147, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 176 (12/18/96).

Applicability of statutes pertaining to public purchasing and public contracting, and governing general contractors, to housing authorities established by municipalities or counties pursuant to T.C.A. §§13-20-101 et seq., OAG 05-170, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 172 (11/21/05).

Tennessee education lottery corporation: contract amendments. OAG 10-73, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (5/21/10).

Applicability of procurement requirements when providing grants and entering into agreements to assist impaired professionals pursuant to T.C.A. §63-1-136; applicability to grant contracts for peer assistance issued by health-related regulatory boards under T.C.A. §63-1-136. OAG 14-98, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 101 (10/30/14).

Law Reviews.

Bid Protests in Tennessee (Steven W. Feldman), 34 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1998).

12-3-102. Exempt agencies and purchases.

Procurements and contracts by and for the following state governmental entities shall be exempt from the operation of this chapter:

The legislative branch;

The judicial branch;

The board of trustees of the University of Tennessee system, the Tennessee board of regents system, the state university boards, the Tennessee higher education commission, and the Tennessee student assistance corporation;

Contracts advertised and awarded by the state building commission pursuant to § 4-15-102. If there is a question whether a contract or procurement requires state building commission or central procurement office approval, the chief procurement officer and the state architect shall determine in writing the procurement method or the contract form that is in the best interest of the state. Any such agreement reached by the chief procurement officer and the state architect shall be subject to the approval of the comptroller of the treasury;

Construction and engineering contracts entered into by the department of transportation pursuant to title 54, chapter 5;

Contracts for procurement of services in connection with the issue, sale, purchase, and delivery of bonds, notes and other debt obligations or the administration, safekeeping, and payment after delivery of such debt obligations by the state or any of its agencies;

Contracts for appraisal, relocation or acquisition services related to the acquisition of land that are entered into by the department of transportation pursuant to title 54, chapter 5; and

Administrative contracts for specific service signs pursuant to title 54, chapter 5, part 11, shall be awarded to the vendor who offers the lowest responsible response. The basis of all responses shall be the least cost to the retail user of the signs. All administrative contracts shall be awarded on an objective, competitive basis pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the department of transportation.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), any or all state entities exempt from the requirements of this part, as well as any private nonprofit institution of higher education chartered in this state, are authorized to procure goods or services under this chapter through the central procurement office.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 9; 2016, ch. 869, § 32; 2020, ch. 794, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 1, §§12-3-101 —12-3-133 (Williams, §§ 370.11, 370.27, 370.31, 370.32, 370.37, 370.39, 370.40); impl. am. Acts 1957, ch. 4, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; Acts 1969, ch. 115, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1969, ch. 302, § 1; Acts 1971, ch. 405, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 144, § 4; 1973, ch. 216, § 1; 1973, ch. 320, § 4; 1975, ch. 60, § 1; 1976, ch. 601, § 1; 1976, ch. 776, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 437, § 1; 1978, ch. 932, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 12-309, 12-328, 12-329, 12-333, 12-334, 12-336; 12-337,12-3-123,12-3-124,12-3-128,12-3-131,12-3-132; Acts 1980, ch. 741, § 4; T.C.A., §12-3-130; Acts 1981, ch. 332, §§ 16, 17; 1986, ch. 896, § 1; 1987, ch. 337, § 17; 1995, ch. 305, § 97; 1996, ch. 682, § 1; 2003, ch. 288, § 1; 2009, ch. 106, § 5; 2010, ch. 694, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19; 2012, ch. 731, § 1) was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 8-12, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to parts of §12-4-109 were transferred to this section.

Former §§12-3-108 —12-3-132 were transferred in 1981.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

Acts 2016, ch. 869, § 33 provided that the state university boards are authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning HOPE Lottery Scholarships and the Tennessee Promise and Reconnect programs, see Acts 2020, ch. 794.

Acts 2020, ch. 794, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Financial Aid Simplification for Tennesseans (FAST) Act”.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a)(3), deleted “and” following “regents system” and added “, the Tennessee higher education commission, and the Tennessee student assistance corporation”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 794, § 70. August 1, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of procurement requirements when providing grants and entering into agreements to assist impaired professionals pursuant to T.C.A. §63-1-136; applicability to grant contracts for peer assistance issued by health-related regulatory boards under T.C.A. §63-1-136. OAG 14-98, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 101 (10/30/14).

12-3-103. Requirements of professional persons or groups providing fiscal agent, financial advisor, advisory or consultant services covered by this part.

Contracts for legal services, fiscal agent, financial advisor or advisory services, educational consultant services, and similar services by professional persons or groups with high ethical standards, shall not be based upon competitive procurement methods, but shall be awarded on the basis of recognized competence and integrity. The prohibition against competitive procurement in this section shall not prohibit any entity enumerated from interviewing eligible persons or entities to determine the capabilities of such persons or entities.

Any person providing fiscal agent, financial advisor or advisory services covered by this part shall perform such services only pursuant to a written contract specifying the services to be rendered, the costs of the services, and the expenses to be covered under such contract.

Any person providing fiscal agent, financial advisor or advisory services covered by this part who desires to respond, directly or indirectly, on any bonds, notes or other obligations of such entity sold pursuant to public, competitive sale shall receive in writing prior to the sale the permission of such entity to respond either directly or indirectly on the obligations.

For the purposes of this section, “providing fiscal agent, financial advisor or advisory services” means a relationship that exists when a person renders, or enters into an agreement to render, financial advisory or consultant services to or on behalf of an issuer with respect to a new issue or issues of municipal securities, including advice with respect to the structure, timing, terms and other similar matters concerning such issue or issues, for a fee or other compensation or in expectation of such compensation for the rendering of such services.

A financial advisory relationship shall not be deemed to exist when, in the course of acting as an underwriter, a municipal securities dealer renders advice to an issuer, including advice with respect to the structure, timing, terms and other similar matters concerning a new issue of municipal securities.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 1, §§12-3-101 —12-3-133 (Williams, §§ 370.11, 370.27, 370.31, 370.32, 370.37, 370.39, 370.40); impl. am. Acts 1957, ch. 4, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; Acts 1969, ch. 115, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1969, ch. 302, § 1; Acts 1971, ch. 405, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 144, § 4; 1973, ch. 216, § 1; 1973, ch. 320, § 4; 1975, ch. 60, § 1; 1976, ch. 601, § 1; 1976, ch. 776, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 437, § 1; 1978, ch. 932, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 12-309, 12-328, 12-329, 12-333, 12-334, 12-336; 12-337,12-3-123,12-3-124,12-3-128,12-3-131,12-3-132; Acts 1980, ch. 741, § 4; T.C.A., §12-3-130; Acts 1981, ch. 332, §§ 16, 17; 1986, ch. 896, § 1; 1987, ch. 337, § 17; 1995, ch. 305, § 97; 1996, ch. 682, § 1; 2003, ch. 288, § 1; 2009, ch. 106, § 5; 2010, ch. 694, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19; 2012, ch. 731, § 1) was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 8-12, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-4-106 were transferred to this section.

Former §§12-3-108 —12-3-132 were transferred in 1981.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-104. Transfer of equipment between departments, institutions and agencies.

Whenever any state department or agency applies to the department of general services to lease or rent any equipment, the department of general services shall first ascertain whether or not any such equipment is available for use from any other department, institution, or agency. The department of general services shall have the power to request the transfer of any such equipment from one (1) department, institution, or agency to another with the approval of the head of the transferring department, institution, or agency.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 1, §§12-3-101 —12-3-133 (Williams, §§ 370.11, 370.27, 370.31, 370.32, 370.37, 370.39, 370.40); impl. am. Acts 1957, ch. 4, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; Acts 1969, ch. 115, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1969, ch. 302, § 1; Acts 1971, ch. 405, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 144, § 4; 1973, ch. 216, § 1; 1973, ch. 320, § 4; 1975, ch. 60, § 1; 1976, ch. 601, § 1; 1976, ch. 776, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 437, § 1; 1978, ch. 932, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 12-309, 12-328, 12-329, 12-333, 12-334, 12-336; 12-337,12-3-123,12-3-124,12-3-128,12-3-131,12-3-132; Acts 1980, ch. 741, § 4; T.C.A., §12-3-130; Acts 1981, ch. 332, §§ 16, 17; 1986, ch. 896, § 1; 1987, ch. 337, § 17; 1995, ch. 305, § 97; 1996, ch. 682, § 1; 2003, ch. 288, § 1; 2009, ch. 106, § 5; 2010, ch. 694, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19; 2012, ch. 731, § 1) was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 8-12, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-104 were enacted at this section.

Former §§12-3-108 —12-3-132 were transferred in 1981.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.